HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  8478 Y 1
SFX  8478 0 ולנו/64993 .
SFX  6392 Y 1
SFX  6392 0 סטיות/64991 .
SFX  12630 Y 1
SFX  12630 0 טך/64991 .
SFX  7106 Y 1
SFX  7106 0 טך/64992 .
SFX  11085 Y 1
SFX  11085 ך כות/64991 .
SFX  7771 Y 1
SFX  7771 0 טך/64993 .
SFX  9615 Y 1
SFX  9615 0 ירוך/64992 .
SFX  12656 Y 1
SFX  12656 0 טותיהן/64991 .
SFX  10496 Y 1
SFX  10496 0 טך/64998 .
SFX  13966 Y 1
SFX  13966 0 טך/64999 .
SFX  12053 Y 1
SFX  12053 0 יבותינו/64991 .
SFX  6459 Y 1
SFX  6459 0 טותיהן/64993 .
SFX  7719 Y 1
SFX  7719 ב ובי/64991 .
SFX  13879 Y 1
SFX  13879 ב ובי/64992 .
SFX  11812 Y 1
SFX  11812 ב ובי/64993 .
SFX  6876 Y 1
SFX  6876 0 מותו/64993 .
SFX  11841 Y 1
SFX  11841 0 ונכן/64992 .
SFX  12839 Y 1
SFX  12839 0 יא/64991 .
SFX  11567 Y 1
SFX  11567 0 בכם/64991 .
SFX  5154 Y 1
SFX  5154 0 ונכן/64993 .
SFX  5692 Y 1
SFX  5692 0 יא/64992 .
SFX  5717 Y 1
SFX  5717 0 בכם/64992 .
SFX  10227 Y 1
SFX  10227 0 יא/64993 .
SFX  5246 Y 1
SFX  5246 0 בכם/64993 .
SFX  6494 Y 1
SFX  6494 ף פד/64992 .
SFX  11935 Y 1
SFX  11935 ה וננו/64992 .
SFX  7276 Y 1
SFX  7276 0 רוה/64992 .
SFX  9011 Y 1
SFX  9011 0 בכם/64998 .
SFX  12628 Y 1
SFX  12628 0 טכן/64991 .
SFX  12251 Y 1
SFX  12251 ס ען/64991 .
SFX  9919 Y 1
SFX  9919 ס ען/64992 .
SFX  7104 Y 1
SFX  7104 0 טכן/64992 .
SFX  11387 Y 1
SFX  11387 ה וננו/64999 .
SFX  9423 Y 1
SFX  9423 ס ען/64993 .
SFX  8730 Y 1
SFX  8730 0 לתו/64991 .
SFX  7769 Y 1
SFX  7769 0 טכן/64993 .
SFX  8798 Y 1
SFX  8798 0 לתו/64992 .
SFX  7080 Y 1
SFX  7080 0 לתו/64993 .
SFX  12616 Y 1
SFX  12616 ל מד/64991 .
SFX  10494 Y 1
SFX  10494 0 טכן/64998 .
SFX  10474 Y 1
SFX  10474 ס ען/64998 .
SFX  13964 Y 1
SFX  13964 0 טכן/64999 .
SFX  6490 Y 1
SFX  6490 ל מד/64992 .
SFX  9958 Y 1
SFX  9958 ד ידוכם/64992 .
SFX  8171 Y 1
SFX  8171 0 וגים/64991 .
SFX  5874 Y 1
SFX  5874 0 פהו/64992 .
SFX  10484 Y 1
SFX  10484 ל מד/64997 .
SFX  7436 Y 1
SFX  7436 ה ומו/64993 .
SFX  13420 Y 1
SFX  13420 0 קלי/64991 .
SFX  8731 Y 1
SFX  8731 0 לתה/64991 .
SFX  13807 Y 1
SFX  13807 0 קלי/64992 .
SFX  8799 Y 1
SFX  8799 0 לתה/64992 .
SFX  12740 Y 1
SFX  12740 0 קלי/64993 .
SFX  7081 Y 1
SFX  7081 0 לתה/64993 .
SFX  9614 Y 1
SFX  9614 0 ירום/64992 .
SFX  9126 Y 1
SFX  9126 0 קתני/64991 .
SFX  7654 Y 1
SFX  7654 0 כל/64991 .
SFX  11465 Y 1
SFX  11465 0 קלי/64995 .
SFX  9761 Y 1
SFX  9761 0 קתני/64992 .
SFX  7404 Y 1
SFX  7404 0 כל/64992 .
SFX  12655 Y 1
SFX  12655 0 טותיו/64991 .
SFX  10980 Y 1
SFX  10980 0 כל/64993 .
SFX  7878 Y 1
SFX  7878 ט ידה/64992 .
SFX  6458 Y 1
SFX  6458 0 טותיו/64993 .
SFX  11630 Y 1
SFX  11630 0 וביי/64993 .
SFX  6573 Y 1
SFX  6573 0 ולוגיים/64991 .
SFX  9362 Y 1
SFX  9362 ם מתני/64992 .
SFX  9097 Y 1
SFX  9097 0 פתך/64991 .
SFX  5872 Y 1
SFX  5872 0 פתך/64992 .
SFX  7471 Y 1
SFX  7471 0 פתך/64993 .
SFX  11840 Y 1
SFX  11840 0 ונם/64992 .
SFX  12082 Y 1
SFX  12082 ד ידה/64991 .
SFX  11566 Y 1
SFX  11566 0 בכן/64991 .
SFX  5153 Y 1
SFX  5153 0 ונם/64993 .
SFX  7359 Y 1
SFX  7359 ד ידה/64992 .
SFX  5716 Y 1
SFX  5716 0 בכן/64992 .
SFX  13133 Y 1
SFX  13133 0 צץ/64991 .
SFX  9928 Y 1
SFX  9928 ד ידה/64993 .
SFX  5245 Y 1
SFX  5245 0 בכן/64993 .
SFX  7804 Y 1
SFX  7804 0 צץ/64992 .
SFX  7403 Y 1
SFX  7403 0 וס/64991 .
SFX  11390 Y 1
SFX  11390 0 צץ/64993 .
SFX  5625 Y 1
SFX  5625 0 וס/64992 .
SFX  12749 Y 1
SFX  12749 0 יניי/64991 .
SFX  9968 Y 1
SFX  9968 0 וס/64993 .
SFX  13129 Y 1
SFX  13129 י ליי/64991 .
SFX  7275 Y 1
SFX  7275 0 רוהו/64992 .
SFX  9010 Y 1
SFX  9010 0 בכן/64998 .
SFX  6406 Y 1
SFX  6406 0 יניי/64993 .
SFX  9299 Y 1
SFX  9299 ד ידה/64999 .
SFX  6371 Y 1
SFX  6371 י ליי/64993 .
SFX  5915 Y 1
SFX  5915 0 פוכם/64992 .
SFX  8729 Y 1
SFX  8729 0 לתך/64991 .
SFX  8797 Y 1
SFX  8797 0 לתך/64992 .
SFX  7079 Y 1
SFX  7079 0 לתך/64993 .
SFX  9957 Y 1
SFX  9957 ד ידוכן/64992 .
SFX  7435 Y 1
SFX  7435 ה ומך/64993 .
SFX  12173 Y 1
SFX  12173 ע קע/64991 .
SFX  7965 Y 1
SFX  7965 ע קע/64992 .
SFX  9613 Y 1
SFX  9613 0 ירון/64992 .
SFX  9217 Y 1
SFX  9217 0 שתני/64991 .
SFX  7285 Y 1
SFX  7285 0 שתני/64992 .
SFX  12654 Y 1
SFX  12654 0 טותיי/64991 .
SFX  9095 Y 1
SFX  9095 0 פתכן/64991 .
SFX  13572 Y 1
SFX  13572 0 מיני/64992 .
SFX  10533 Y 1
SFX  10533 ע קע/64997 .
SFX  5870 Y 1
SFX  5870 0 פתכן/64992 .
SFX  6457 Y 1
SFX  6457 0 טותיי/64993 .
SFX  7469 Y 1
SFX  7469 0 פתכן/64993 .
SFX  9275 Y 1
SFX  9275 0 מיני/64994 .
SFX  12180 Y 1
SFX  12180 0 חנו/64991 .
SFX  11570 Y 1
SFX  11570 0 ביה/64991 .
SFX  13810 Y 1
SFX  13810 0 ביה/64992 .
SFX  5818 Y 1
SFX  5818 0 חנו/64992 .
SFX  5260 Y 1
SFX  5260 0 ביה/64993 .
SFX  6502 Y 1
SFX  6502 0 חנו/64993 .
SFX  11067 Y 1
SFX  11067 0 ביה/64994 .
SFX  12546 Y 1
SFX  12546 י לך/64991 .
SFX  9696 Y 1
SFX  9696 0 חנו/64998 .
SFX  5831 Y 1
SFX  5831 י לך/64992 .
SFX  11148 Y 1
SFX  11148 0 חנו/64999 .
SFX  9096 Y 1
SFX  9096 0 פתכם/64991 .
SFX  7535 Y 1
SFX  7535 י לך/64993 .
SFX  5871 Y 1
SFX  5871 0 פתכם/64992 .
SFX  7470 Y 1
SFX  7470 0 פתכם/64993 .
SFX  11565 Y 1
SFX  11565 0 בם/64991 .
SFX  5715 Y 1
SFX  5715 0 בם/64992 .
SFX  5244 Y 1
SFX  5244 0 בם/64993 .
SFX  13723 Y 1
SFX  13723 0 קיהו/64992 .
SFX  6218 Y 1
SFX  6218 0 זן/64991 .
SFX  6647 Y 1
SFX  6647 0 זן/64992 .
SFX  12450 Y 1
SFX  12450 0 יעו/64991 .
SFX  10172 Y 1
SFX  10172 0 קיהו/64994 .
SFX  5771 Y 1
SFX  5771 0 זן/64993 .
SFX  11740 Y 1
SFX  11740 0 יעו/64992 .
SFX  7274 Y 1
SFX  7274 0 רוך/64992 .
SFX  9461 Y 1
SFX  9461 0 יעו/64993 .
SFX  9009 Y 1
SFX  9009 0 בם/64998 .
SFX  11115 Y 1
SFX  11115 0 זן/64998 .
SFX  5914 Y 1
SFX  5914 0 פוכן/64992 .
SFX  8728 Y 1
SFX  8728 0 לתכם/64991 .
SFX  8796 Y 1
SFX  8796 0 לתכם/64992 .
SFX  11047 Y 1
SFX  11047 0 יעו/64999 .
SFX  8532 Y 1
SFX  8532 0 ריותיהם/64993 .
SFX  7078 Y 1
SFX  7078 0 לתכם/64993 .
SFX  9611 Y 1
SFX  9611 0 ירוני/64992 .
SFX  13251 Y 1
SFX  13251 ם מץ/64991 .
SFX  7649 Y 1
SFX  7649 ם מץ/64992 .
SFX  13986 Y 1
SFX  13986 ח ידיה/64992 .
SFX  11337 Y 1
SFX  11337 ם מץ/64993 .
SFX  13159 Y 1
SFX  13159 ט יטתם/64991 .
SFX  10061 Y 1
SFX  10061 ט יטתם/64992 .
SFX  9830 Y 1
SFX  9830 ף פתכם/64992 .
SFX  8533 Y 1
SFX  8533 0 ריותיה/64993 .
SFX  11960 Y 1
SFX  11960 0 תותיה/64991 .
SFX  9612 Y 1
SFX  9612 0 ירונו/64992 .
SFX  13573 Y 1
SFX  13573 0 מיהו/64992 .
SFX  12653 Y 1
SFX  12653 0 טותייך/64991 .
SFX  12372 Y 1
SFX  12372 ם מנת/64991 .
SFX  9094 Y 1
SFX  9094 0 פתנו/64991 .
SFX  7617 Y 1
SFX  7617 0 תותיה/64993 .
SFX  9276 Y 1
SFX  9276 0 מיהו/64994 .
SFX  5869 Y 1
SFX  5869 0 פתנו/64992 .
SFX  6456 Y 1
SFX  6456 0 טותייך/64993 .
SFX  7468 Y 1
SFX  7468 0 פתנו/64993 .
SFX  8252 Y 1
SFX  8252 0 ען/64991 .
SFX  11463 Y 1
SFX  11463 ף פתך/64992 .
SFX  5480 Y 1
SFX  5480 0 ען/64992 .
SFX  7225 Y 1
SFX  7225 0 ען/64993 .
SFX  12435 Y 1
SFX  12435 0 ללת/64991 .
SFX  11327 Y 1
SFX  11327 0 ללת/64992 .
SFX  8674 Y 1
SFX  8674 0 ען/64998 .
SFX  11892 Y 1
SFX  11892 0 ורו/64992 .
SFX  10694 Y 1
SFX  10694 0 בתינו/64992 .
SFX  6469 Y 1
SFX  6469 0 ורו/64993 .
SFX  13722 Y 1
SFX  13722 0 קיני/64992 .
SFX  6217 Y 1
SFX  6217 0 זתם/64991 .
SFX  8765 Y 1
SFX  8765 0 זתם/64992 .
SFX  12864 Y 1
SFX  12864 0 יקו/64991 .
SFX  12021 Y 1
SFX  12021 0 יבה/64991 .
SFX  10171 Y 1
SFX  10171 0 קיני/64994 .
SFX  6725 Y 1
SFX  6725 0 זתם/64993 .
SFX  11725 Y 1
SFX  11725 0 יקו/64992 .
SFX  6832 Y 1
SFX  6832 0 יבה/64992 .
SFX  12268 Y 1
SFX  12268 0 ירו/64991 .
SFX  10638 Y 1
SFX  10638 0 יבה/64993 .
SFX  9762 Y 1
SFX  9762 0 יקו/64993 .
SFX  11701 Y 1
SFX  11701 0 ירו/64992 .
SFX  9583 Y 1
SFX  9583 0 ירו/64993 .
SFX  8727 Y 1
SFX  8727 0 לתכן/64991 .
SFX  8795 Y 1
SFX  8795 0 לתכן/64992 .
SFX  12300 Y 1
SFX  12300 0 יריי/64991 .
SFX  10092 Y 1
SFX  10092 0 יבה/64999 .
SFX  9335 Y 1
SFX  9335 0 יקו/64999 .
SFX  8531 Y 1
SFX  8531 0 ריותיהן/64993 .
SFX  7077 Y 1
SFX  7077 0 לתכן/64993 .
SFX  10958 Y 1
SFX  10958 0 בותו/64992 .
SFX  11505 Y 1
SFX  11505 0 יריי/64993 .
SFX  10190 Y 1
SFX  10190 0 ירו/64999 .
SFX  5975 Y 1
SFX  5975 0 בותו/64993 .
SFX  12651 Y 1
SFX  12651 0 טותיכם/64991 .
SFX  7988 Y 1
SFX  7988 0 נונו/64992 .
SFX  13985 Y 1
SFX  13985 ח ידינו/64992 .
SFX  9224 Y 1
SFX  9224 0 נונו/64993 .
